Washington statutes.
RCW 2.72.020

Office of public guardianship and conservatorship created—Appointment of public guardianship and conservatorship administrator.

(1) There is created an office of public guardianship and conservatorship within the administrative office of the courts.

(2) The supreme court shall appoint a public guardianship and conservatorship administrator to establish and administer a public guardianship, public conservatorship, decision-making assistance, and estate administration program in the office of public guardianship and conservatorship. The public guardianship and conservatorship administrator serves at the pleasure of the supreme court.

[ 2020 c 312 s 403; 2019 c 215 s 3; 2007 c 364 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.